Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-602
Telegraph companies and press associations; statement; filing.

Every telegraph company and every press association or corporation engaged in the transmission, collection, distribution, or delivery of telegraph dispatches, either for private use or for publication in newspapers, shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a statement, a copy of its articles of incorporation or other articles of organization, and a copy of its regulations and bylaws. The statement shall be certified under oath by the president and secretary or by two of the officers and shall contain: (1) The name of the association; (2) the amount of capital invested; and (3) the character of its business.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 2, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 7396;

C.S.1922, § 7071;

C.S.1929, § 86-102;

R.S.1943, § 86-102;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 549;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-102;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 364.